Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
Penalties

351.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

351.315

to

351.375

or any administrative regulation, determination, or order promulgated in accordance with KRS

351.315

to

351.375

shall be subject to a civil fine not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation.

Any person who willfully violates any of the provisions of KRS

351.315

to

351.375

or any administrative regulation, determination, or order promulgated in accordance with KRS

351.315

to

351.375

which has become final shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 351.330(16) shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 351.345(2) shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any operator who fails to obtain his license as required by KRS

351.175

shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor as defined in KRS

532.090

. Each day the mine is operated without a license constitutes a separate offense. Venue for the offenses shall lie in the county in which the offense occurred.

Any operator operating a mine with knowledge that the mine has been placed under a valid closure order pursuant to KRS

351.175

shall be guilty of a Class D felony. Jurisdiction shall lie in the Circuit Court of the county in which the offense occurred.

Any blasting operation that results in the death or serious physical injury of a person may be subject to a civil fine not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000). For the purposes of this subsection, “serious physical injury” means an injury which has a reasonable potential to cause death.

Any person who fails a drug or alcohol test required by KRS

351.182

,

351.183

,

351.184

,

351.185

, or

352.180

shall be subject to the following penalties if an appeal to the Mine Safety Review Commission is chosen and the appeal is not successful:

A first offense shall result in probation, suspension, or combination of both, as well as other conditions and time constraints as ordered by the Mine Safety Review Commission. During this time, the person shall be ineligible for any license or certification issued by the division. All licenses and certifications shall be restored upon compliance with the orders of the Mine Safety Review Commission. The failure to pursue an appeal will result in revocation of all licenses or certifications issued by the division for three (3) years;

A second offense shall result in the revocation of all certifications and licenses issued by the division for a period of five (5) years. During this time, the person shall be ineligible for any license or certification issued by the division. Certifications and licenses revoked under this provision may be reissued by:

Compliance with all training and testing requirements;

Satisfying the requirements of KRS

351.182

and

351.183

;

Compliance with all orders of the Mine Safety Review Commission; and

A third offense shall result in the permanent revocation of all licenses and certifications issued by the division. The person shall be permanently ineligible for licenses and certifications issued by the division.

The Mine Safety Review Commission shall not have the authority to reconsider any order permanently revoking a miner’s license or certifications issued by the division if the commission’s order is final unless, at the time of the entry of the order, the miner was incarcerated or hospitalized, or the miner did not receive actual notice of the motion or other filing seeking permanent revocation, or did not actually receive notification by the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources pursuant to KRS

351.120

.

HISTORY:

2739-49, 3766b-18: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 280, § 5; 1972, ch. 298, § 18; 1976, ch. 143, § 13; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, §§ 11(7), (29); 1980, ch. 188, § 278, effective July 1, 1980; 1992, ch. 463, § 39, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 161, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 308, § 19, effective April 9, 1996; 1996, ch. 318, § 334, effective July 15, 1996; 2006, ch. 39, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2012, ch. 89, § 7, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 87, § 27, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2012). Under the authority of KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes has altered the format of the text in subsection (8) of this statute during codification. The words in the text were not changed.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Venue for a prosecution pursuant to subsection (13) (now (5)) of this section for mining without obtaining a mine license lies only in the county in which the illegal mine is located.

OAG 83-288

.

351.9901.
Moratorium ending April 8, 1996, on levying of mandatory fines and penalties pursuant to KRS 351.990 — Exceptions.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, there shall be, beginning on April 8, 1994, a two (2) year moratorium on the levying of any mandatory fines or penalties pursuant to KRS

351.990

against the operator or miner who violates any provision of this chapter, except the two (2) year moratorium shall not apply to the penalty provisions of KRS

351.990

(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), and (6).

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 297, § 1, effective April 8, 1994; 1996, ch. 308, § 49, effective April 9, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.